Utah statutes.
77-27-27.   Retaking or reincarceration for parole or probation violations
-- Hearing and notice to sending state -- Detention of parolee or probationer.
Where supervision of a parolee or probationer is being administered pursuant
to the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers,
the appropriate judicial or administrative authorities in this state shall
notify the compact administrator of the sending state whenever, in their view,
consideration should be given to retaking or reincarceration for a parole or
probation violation. Prior to the giving of any such notification, a hearing
shall be held in accordance with this act within a reasonable time, unless
such hearing is waived by the parolee or probationer. The appropriate officer
or officers of this state shall as soon as practicable, following termination
of any hearing, report to the sending state, furnish a copy of the hearing
record, and make recommendations regarding the disposition to be made of the
parolee or probationer by the sending state. Pending any proceeding pursuant
to this section, the appropriate officers of this state may take custody of
and detain the parolee or probationer involved for a period not to exceed 15
days prior to the hearing and, if it appears to the hearing officer or
officers that retaking or reincarceration is likely to follow, for such
reasonable period after the hearing or waiver as may be necessary to arrange
for the retaking or reincarceration.
